Hawaii statutes.
§486K-3 Sale of detained baggage; notice;
disposition of proceeds. All baggage and property so held by the keeper of
the hotel, after the expiration of three months from the date of the detention,
shall be sold at public auction, after notice thereof published three times in
a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the hotel is kept. The
proceeds thereof shall be applied to the payment of the amount due and the
expenses of the notice and sale. The balance, if any remaining, shall be paid over
to the owner of the property or the owner's representative. If the balance is
not claimed by the owner within sixty days after sale, then the balance shall
be paid over to the director of finance of the State and shall be kept by the
director in a special deposit for payment to the owner and shall be disposed of
as provided in chapter 523A. [L 1978, c 234, pt of §3; am L 1985, c 68, §17]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next